Maine, session 132, LD379.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §8904, sub-§1 is enacted to read:
1. Confidentiality. Emergency plans of action that contain any of the following
information are confidential and exempt from public records requirements pursuant to Title
1, chapter 13:
A. Personal contact information;
B. Information related to gaining access to gates, locks or roads;
C. Proprietary information of a landowner; or
D. Emergency response information acquired by the director through forest fire
preparedness and planning activities.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §8904, sub-§2 is enacted to read:
2. Disclosure of confidential information. The director may disclose information
that is considered confidential under subsection 1 to another state agency for the purposes
of emergency incident response and planning.
Page 1 - 132LR0361(03)